Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 4. Emergency Custody and Involuntary Temporary Detention.
§ 37.2-810.
Transportation of person in the temporary detention process.

In specifying the primary law-enforcement agency and jurisdiction for purposes of this section, the magistrate shall specify in the temporary detention order the law-enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the person resides, or any other willing law-enforcement agency that has agreed to provide transportation, to execute the order and, in cases in which transportation is ordered to be provided by the primary law-enforcement agency, provide transportation. However, if the nearest boundary of the jurisdiction in which the person resides is more than 50 miles from the nearest boundary of the jurisdiction in which the person is located, the law-enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the person is located shall execute the order and provide transportation.

The magistrate issuing the temporary detention order shall (i) specify the law-enforcement agency to execute the order and (ii) designate a transportation provider. In determining the transportation provider, the magistrate shall consider any request to authorize transportation by an alternative transportation provider in accordance with this section, whenever an alternative transportation provider is identified to the magistrate, which may be a person, facility, or agency, including a family member or friend of the person who is the subject of the temporary detention order, a representative of the community services board, an employee of or person providing services pursuant to a contract with the Department, or other transportation provider with personnel trained to provide transportation in a safe manner. Upon determining, following consideration of information provided by the petitioner; the community services board or its designee; the local law-enforcement agency, if any; the person’s treating physician, if any; or other persons who are available and have knowledge of the person, and, when the magistrate deems appropriate, the proposed alternative transportation provider, either in person or via two-way electronic video and audio or telephone communication system, that an alternative transportation provider is available to provide transportation, willing to provide transportation, and able to provide transportation in a safe manner, the magistrate shall designate such alternative transportation provider to provide transportation of the person. If no alternative transportation provider is available to provide transportation, willing to provide transportation, and able to provide transportation in a safe manner, the magistrate shall designate the primary law-enforcement agency and jurisdiction designated to execute the temporary detention order to provide transportation of the person.

When transportation is ordered to be provided by an alternative transportation provider, the magistrate shall order the specified law-enforcement agency to execute the order, to take the person into custody, and to transfer custody of the person to the alternative transportation provider identified in the order. The primary law-enforcement agency may transfer custody of the person to the alternative transportation provider immediately upon execution of the temporary detention order based on the availability of alternative transportation providers. The alternative transportation provider shall maintain custody of the person from the time custody is transferred to the alternative transportation provider by the primary law-enforcement agency until such time as custody of the person is transferred to the temporary detention facility, including during any period prior to the initiation of transportation of the person from the facility to which he was transported pursuant to §

37.2-808

and while transportation is being provided pursuant to this section.

In such cases, a copy of the temporary detention order shall accompany the person being transported pursuant to this section at all times and shall be delivered by the alternative transportation provider to the temporary detention facility. The temporary detention facility shall return a copy of the temporary detention order to the court designated by the magistrate as soon as is practicable. Delivery of an order to a law-enforcement officer or alternative transportation provider and return of an order to the court may be accomplished electronically or by facsimile.

The order may include transportation of the person to such other medical facility as may be necessary to obtain further medical evaluation or treatment prior to placement as required by a physician at the admitting temporary detention facility. Nothing herein shall preclude a law-enforcement officer or alternative transportation provider from obtaining emergency medical treatment or further medical evaluation at any time for a person in his custody as provided in this section. Such medical evaluation or treatment shall be conducted immediately in accordance with state and federal law.

If an alternative transportation provider providing transportation or maintaining custody of a person who is the subject of a temporary detention order becomes unable to continue providing transportation or maintaining custody of the person at any time after taking custody of the person, the primary law-enforcement agency for the jurisdiction in which the alternative transportation provider is located at the time he becomes unable to continue providing transportation or maintaining custody shall take custody of the person and shall transport the person to the facility of temporary detention. In such cases, a copy of the temporary detention order shall accompany the person being transported and shall be delivered to and returned by the temporary detention facility in accordance with the provisions of subsection B.

In cases in which an alternative facility of temporary detention is identified and the law-enforcement agency or alternative transportation provider identified to provide transportation in accordance with subsection B continues to have custody of the person, the local law-enforcement agency or alternative transportation provider shall transport the person to the alternative facility of temporary detention identified by the employee or designee of the community services board. In cases in which an alternative facility of temporary detention is identified and custody of the person has been transferred from the law-enforcement agency or alternative transportation provider that provided transportation in accordance with subsection B to the initial facility of temporary detention, the employee or designee of the community services board shall request, and a magistrate may enter an order specifying, an alternative transportation provider or, if no alternative transportation provider is available, willing, and able to provide transportation in a safe manner, the local law-enforcement agency for the jurisdiction in which the person resides or, if the nearest boundary of the jurisdiction in which the person resides is more than 50 miles from the nearest boundary of the jurisdiction in which the person is located, the law-enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the person is located, to provide transportation.

The magistrate may change the transportation provider specified in a temporary detention order at any time prior to the initiation of transportation of a person who is the subject of a temporary detention order pursuant to this section. If the designated transportation provider is changed by the magistrate at any time after the temporary detention order has been executed but prior to the initiation of transportation, the transportation provider having custody of the person shall transfer custody of the person to the transportation provider subsequently specified to provide transportation. For the purposes of this subsection, “transportation provider” includes both a law-enforcement agency and an alternative transportation provider.

A law-enforcement officer may lawfully go to or be sent beyond the territorial limits of the county, city, or town in which he serves to any point in the Commonwealth for the purpose of executing any temporary detention order pursuant to this section. Law-enforcement agencies may enter into agreements to facilitate the execution of temporary detention orders and provide transportation.

No person who provides alternative transportation pursuant to this section shall be liable to the person being transported for any civil damages for ordinary negligence in acts or omissions that result from providing such alternative transportation.

For purposes of this section:

“Law-enforcement agency”
includes an auxiliary police force established pursuant to §

15.2-1731

.

“Law-enforcement officer”
includes an auxiliary police officer appointed or provided for pursuant to §§

15.2-1731

and

15.2-1733

.

History.

1974, c. 351, § 37.1-67.1; 1975, cc. 237, 433; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 1981, c. 463; 1986, cc. 478, 629; 1987, c. 96; 1988, c. 98; 1989, c. 716; 1990, cc. 429, 728; 1991, c. 159; 1992, c. 566; 1995, c. 844; 1996, cc. 343, 893; 1998, cc. 37, 594, 611; 2004, c. 737; 2005, c. 716; 2007, c. 7; 2009, cc. 112, 697; 2013, c. 371; 2014, cc. 317, 675; 2015, cc. 297, 308; 2020, cc. 879, 880; 2022, cc. 482, 730.

Editor's notes.

Acts 2022, c. 730, cl. 2 provides: “That, pursuant to subdivision 11 of §

9.1-102

of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Criminal Justice Services, when establishing compulsory minimum training standards for auxiliary police officers who are called into service solely for the purpose of providing transportation for such person subject to an emergency custody order pursuant to §

37.2-808

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, or to provide transportation for a person in the temporary detention process pursuant to §

37.2-810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be limited to establishing such compulsory minimum training standards to courses related to weapons, defensive tactics, de-escalation techniques, and working with individuals with disabilities, mental health needs, or substance use disorders.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 7, in subsection A, substituted “further medical evaluation or treatment prior to placement as required by a physician at the admitting temporary detention facility” for “emergency medical evaluation or treatment prior to placement” in the fourth sentence and substituted “Such medical evaluation” for “Such evaluation” at the beginning of the last sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 112 and 697 are nearly identical, and divided former subsection A into present subsection A and the last paragraph of subsection B; rewrote the former first two sentences in subsection A; in subsection B, added the present first paragraph and inserted “or alternative transportation provider” in the next-to-last sentence of the last paragraph; and redesignated former subsection B as subsection C.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 371, in subsection B, in the second sentence, inserted the language beginning “in cases in which the temporary detention” and ending “other relevant information,” substituted “shall consider any request to” for “may,” and inserted “in accordance with this section, whenever an alternative transportation provider is identified to the magistrate, which may be a person, facility, or agency.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 317 in subsection A inserted “or any other willing law-enforcement agency that has agreed to provide transportation”; and deleted “primary” preceding “law-enforcement” in the third sentence of subsection B.

The 2014 amendment by c. 675 added subsection C, and redesignated former subsection C as present D.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 297 and 308 are identical, and and in the second sentence in subsection B, deleted “in cases in which the temporary detention order is based upon a finding that the person who is the subject of the order has a mental illness and that there exists a substantial likelihood that, as a result of mental illness, the person will, in the near future, suffer serious harm due to his lack of capacity to protect himself from harm or to provide for his basic human needs but there is no substantial likelihood that the person will cause serious physical harm to himself or others as evidenced by recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening harm and other relevant information,” following “However” and added subsection E.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 879 and 880 are identical, and inserted subsections C and E and redesignated accordingly and in subsection D, last sentence, substituted “custody of the person” for “custody of the individual.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 482 in subsection B, rewrote the first paragraph, which read: “The magistrate issuing the temporary detention order shall specify the law-enforcement agency to execute the order and provide transportation. However, the magistrate shall consider any request to authorize transportation by an alternative transportation provider in accordance with this section, whenever an alternative transportation provider is identified to the magistrate, which may be a person, facility, or agency, including a family member or friend of the person who is the subject of the temporary detention order, a representative of the community services board, or other transportation provider with personnel trained to provide transportation in a safe manner upon determining, following consideration of information provided by the petitioner; the community services board or its designee; the local law-enforcement agency, if any; the person’s treating physician, if any; or other persons who are available and have knowledge of the person, and, when the magistrate deems appropriate, the proposed alternative transportation provider, either in person or via two-way electronic video and audio or telephone communication system, that the proposed alternative transportation provider is available to provide transportation, willing to provide transportation, and able to provide transportation in a safe manner,” and added the second and third sentences in the second paragraph; and inserted “or maintaining custody” three times in subsection C.

The 2022 amendment by c. 730, added subsection H.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Execution of emergency custody and temporary detention orders and transportation of patients. —

The General Assembly intends city and county police departments, and sheriffs’ offices in counties without police departments, that perform primary law-enforcement functions to execute emergency custody orders and provide transportation for emergency medical evaluation or treatment. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Dale Muterspaugh, Sheriff for Alleghany County, 04-45,
(7/15/04) (but see 2009 amendments to this section as to transportation).

Transportation pursuant to temporary detention order. —

Sheriff is not authorized under subsection O of §

37.2-808

to delay transportation of an individual following the issuance of a temporary detention order when the community services board and the designated state facility continue to search for an alternative facility. Rather, the sheriff should commence transportation to the designated state facility without delay, but if an alternative facility is identified during the period of transport, transportation should be provided to that facility instead. See opinion of Attorney General to Honorable Steve A. Hutcherson, Sheriff, Campbell County, 19-004,
(10/25/19).

Magistrate to specify primary law-enforcement agency of the jurisdiction. —

When a magistrate orders a law-enforcement agency to execute an order subjecting a person to emergency custody under §

37.2-808

, or temporary detention under §

37.2-810

, or providing for the transportation of such persons, the magistrate should specify the police department of the town as the “primary law-enforcement agency of the jurisdiction” when a town is served by its own police department. If the town is not served by its own police department, the sheriff’s office of the surrounding county is tasked with executing such orders and with transporting persons subject to such orders. See opinion of Attorney General to Karen T. Mullins, Esquire, County Attorney, Wise County, 11-123,
(10/21/11).

In jurisdictions served by police departments, the police department rather than the sheriff is the “primary law-enforcement agency” to execute both emergency custody under §

37.2-808

and temporary detention orders under §

37.2-810

and to provide transportation pursuant to such orders. See opinion of Attorney General to Karen T. Mullins, Esquire, County Attorney, Wise County, 11-123,
(10/21/11).

Custody of patient after delivery to medical facility. —

A sheriff discharges his duty when he transports an individual to a hospital pursuant to an order of temporary detention, and he is not required to remain for the screening process, unless the temporary detention order includes a specific requirement to transport the person to such other medical facility as may be necessary to obtain emergency medical evaluation or treatment prior to placement of the individual; in such situations, the custody of the individual remains with the sheriff until the individual is delivered to the temporary detention facility. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert J. Deeds, Sheriff for Williamsburg-James City County, 01-114, 2002 Va. AG LEXIS 27 (3/29/02) (decided under prior law).

The term “jurisdiction”

in § 37.1-67.01 [now see §

37.2-808

] and subsection C of former § 37.1-67.1 [now this section] refers to the locality or political subdivision served by the law-enforcement agency. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Dale Muterspaugh, Sheriff for Alleghany County, 04-45,
(7/15/04).

Jurisdiction encompasses any locality or political subdivision, so that if a town has organized its own police department, that department, rather than the surrounding county’s sheriff’s office or police department is the primary law-enforcement agency. If the town does not have its own police department, then the responsibility for the orders and accompanying transportation falls to the county police department if there is one, and to the sheriff’s office if there is not. See opinion of Attorney General to Karen T. Mullins, Esquire, County Attorney, Wise County, 11-123,
(10/21/11).

§ 37.2-811.
Emergency treatment of inmates in the custody of local correctional facilities.

In any case in which temporary detention is ordered pursuant to §

37.2-809

upon petition of a person having custody of an inmate in accordance with subdivision A 2 of §

19.2-169.6

, the magistrate executing the temporary detention order shall place the person in a hospital designated by the Commissioner as appropriate for treatment and evaluation of persons under a criminal charge or, if such facility is not available, the inmate shall be detained in a local correctional facility or other place of confinement for persons charged with criminal offenses and shall be transferred to such hospital as soon as possible thereafter.

The hearing shall be held, upon notice to the attorney for the inmate, either (i) before the court having jurisdiction over the inmate’s case or (ii) before a district court judge or special justice in accordance with the provisions of §

37.2-820

, in which case the inmate shall be represented by counsel as specified in §

37.2-814

.

History.

1974, c. 351, § 37.1-67.1; 1975, cc. 237, 433; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 1981, c. 463; 1986, cc. 478, 629; 1987, c. 96; 1988, c. 98; 1989, c. 716; 1990, cc. 429, 728; 1991, c. 159; 1992, c. 566; 1995, c. 844; 1996, cc. 343, 893; 1998, cc. 37, 594, 611; 2004, c. 737; 2005, c. 716; 2010, cc. 340, 406.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 340 and 406 are identical, and substituted “inmate” for “defendant” throughout, substituted “local correctional facility” for “jail” in subsection A, and made minor stylistic changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Statute not preempted by federal law. —

The federal Emergency Medical Treatment Act does not preempt or conflict with the statute; instead, the federal act complements the statute by providing a court with the authority to place an individual at any hospital with emergency room departments that execute Medicare provider agreements and, therefore, organizations affected by the federal act and the statute must develop annual written agreements with community services boards to reach satisfactory arrangements for the provision of qualified examiners to perform evaluation services. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Kenneth W. Stolle, Member, Senate of Virginia, 01-063,
(6/28/01).

Execution of emergency custody and temporary detention orders and transportation of patients. —

The General Assembly intends city and county police departments, and sheriffs’ offices in counties without police departments, that perform primary law-enforcement functions to execute emergency custody orders and provide transportation for emergency medical evaluation or treatment. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Dale Muterspaugh, Sheriff for Alleghany County, 04-45,
(7/15/04).

§ 37.2-812.
Repealed by Acts 2010, cc. 778 and 825, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

37.2-812

, concerning temporary detention and involuntary admission of minors, was derived from Acts 1974, c. 351, § 37.1-67.1; 1975, cc. 237, 433; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 1981, c. 463; 1986, cc. 478, 629; 1987, c. 96; 1988, c. 98; 1989, c. 716; 1990, cc. 429, 728; 1991, c. 159; 1992, c. 566; 1995, c. 844; 1996, cc. 343, 893; 1998, cc. 37, 594, 611; 2004, c. 737; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-813.
(Effective until October 1, 2022) Release of person prior to commitment hearing for involuntary admission.

Prior to a hearing as authorized in §§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

, the district court judge or special justice may release the person on his personal recognizance or bond set by the district court judge or special justice if it appears from all evidence readily available that the person does not meet the commitment criteria specified in subsection D of §

37.2-817

. The director of any facility in which the person is detained may release the person prior to a hearing as authorized in §§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

if it appears, based on an evaluation conducted by the psychiatrist or clinical psychologist treating the person, that the person would not meet the commitment criteria specified in subsection D of §

37.2-817

if released.

History.

1974, c. 351, § 37.1-67.1; 1975, cc. 237, 433; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 1981, c. 463; 1986, cc. 478, 629; 1987, c. 96; 1988, c. 98; 1989, c. 716; 1990, cc. 429, 728; 1991, c. 159; 1992, c. 566; 1995, c. 844; 1996, cc. 343, 893; 1998, cc. 37, 594, 611; 2004, c. 737; 2005, c. 716; 2008, cc. 779, 850, 870; 2010, cc. 778, 825.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 763, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2022.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 779, 850 and 870 are identical, and substituted “does not meet the commitment criteria specified in subsection C of §

37.2-817

” for “will not pose an imminent danger to himself or others” in the first sentence; and substituted “meet the commitment criteria specified in subsection C of §

37.2-817

or § 16.1-345” for “present an imminent danger to himself or others” in the last sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and deleted “or § 16.1-341” following “through

37.2-819

” twice, deleted the second sentence, which read: “In the case of a minor, the juvenile and domestic relations district court judge may release the minor to his parent,” and deleted “or § 16.1-345” following “of §

37.2-817

.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Execution of emergency custody and temporary detention orders and transportation of patients. —

The General Assembly intends city and county police departments, and sheriffs’ offices in counties without police departments, that perform primary law-enforcement functions to execute emergency custody orders and provide transportation for emergency medical evaluation or treatment. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Dale Muterspaugh, Sheriff for Alleghany County, 04-45,
(7/15/04).

§ 37.2-813.
(Effective October 1, 2022) Release of person prior to commitment hearing for involuntary admission.

Prior to a hearing as authorized in §§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

, the district court judge or special justice may release the person on his personal recognizance or bond set by the district court judge or special justice if it appears from all evidence readily available that the person does not meet the commitment criteria specified in subsection C of §

37.2-817

. The director of any facility in which the person is detained may release the person prior to a hearing as authorized in §§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

if it appears, based on an evaluation conducted by the psychiatrist or clinical psychologist treating the person, that the person would not meet the commitment criteria specified in subsection C of §

37.2-817

if released.

History.

1974, c. 351, § 37.1-67.1; 1975, cc. 237, 433; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 1981, c. 463; 1986, cc. 478, 629; 1987, c. 96; 1988, c. 98; 1989, c. 716; 1990, cc. 429, 728; 1991, c. 159; 1992, c. 566; 1995, c. 844; 1996, cc. 343, 893; 1998, cc. 37, 594, 611; 2004, c. 737; 2005, c. 716; 2008, cc. 779, 850, 870; 2010, cc. 778, 825; 2022, c. 763.

For this section as in effect until October 1, 2022,

see the bound volume.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 763, substituted “subsection C” for “subsection D” twice.